Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2246.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3111(c) of Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3111. State water plan.* * *(c) Limitation of authority.--[Nothing] Except as provided under section 3118.1 (relating to covered data centers), nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to authorize, expand or diminish the existing authority of the department, including the Environmental Quality Board, to regulate, control or require permits for the withdrawal or use of water.Section 2. Title 27 is amended by adding a section to read:1234567891011121314151617 § 3118.1. Covered data centers.(a) Department powers.--Subject to the provisions of section 501 of the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law, in order to implement the provisions of this section, the department may:(1) require notification and reporting from a covered data center related to water use and water withdrawals;(2) require additional conditions for a permit issued under section 402 of The Clean Streams Law to a covered data center;(3) monitor water withdrawals by a covered data center; and(4) coordinate with other governmental bodies as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.(b) Preapplication notification.--(1) In addition to any other requirements under Federal or State law, a person who is developing a covered data center project shall notify the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department.(2) Upon receipt of the notice under paragraph (1), the department shall require a covered data center to report additional information to assess the ability of a water source to adequately meet the water use needs of the project at a proposed location. Information requested by the department shall include:(i) A description of the proposed covered data center project and how water will be used.(ii) Daily, monthly and annual estimated maximum water use and discharge rates and volumes.(iii) The anticipated water source.20260HB2246PN2937 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Evidence that the proposed withdrawal will not adversely affect the quantity or quality of water for other uses or users and that the designations and uses of the source water body will be maintained.(v) Water quality and temperature requirements for both intake and discharge.(vi) Additional necessary information as determined by the department.(3) The department shall review and evaluate the information supplied under paragraph (2) and provide a written response within 30 days, which may be transmitted electronically, describing the potential water availability constraints at each proposed site.(c) Additional permit considerations.--(1) When issuing a new or modified permit under section 402 of The Clean Streams Law to a covered data center, the department shall ensure that:(i) adequate protections for the environment, water quality, public health and public safety are maintained;(ii) water quality, water quantity and affordability for customers of a public water system and adjacent water users, including private wells, are not adversely impacted by the covered data center;(iii) the quantity of water available is sufficient to support the use by the covered data center;(iv) water use conflicts are addressed consistent with relevant State and local law; and(v) technologies and other measures that promote water conservation are considered, including, but not limited to:20260HB2246PN2937 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) using water efficient fixtures and practices;(B) recycling water before discharging;(C) partnering with local water utilities to use discharged water from the covered data center;(D) using reclaimed water;(E) installing closed-loop systems; and(F) supporting water restoration and replenishment in local watersheds.(2) The department shall require a permit applicant to conduct an aquifer test if the department determines that the test results are necessary in order to ensure compliance with this subsection.(3) If the covered data center is within the jurisdiction of a river basin commission, the department shall require a permit applicant under this section to obtain approval from the relevant river basin commission prior to commencing water withdrawals.(d) Coordination.--The department shall consult and coordinate with other Commonwealth agencies, the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, municipalities, river basin commissions and county conservation districts as needed when reviewing or evaluating a project under this section.(e) Denial.--The department shall deny any request if the department finds that there is a reasonably foreseeable risk of adverse impact to adjacent water users, waters of the Commonwealth, wetlands or any other water use as shall be prescribed by the department through promulgation of regulations under this section.(f) Monitoring.--20260HB2246PN2937 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The department shall require monitoring of water sources, including both surface and groundwater sources, for any adverse impact after construction is complete.(2) If there is an adverse impact to adjacent water users, waters of the Commonwealth, wetlands or other water use, the department shall require the covered data center to temporarily cease withdrawal until the adverse impact is remedied.(g) Forms.--The department shall publish and make available all forms created in accordance with this section on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(h) Fee.--(1) The department may charge a fee in an amount set by the Environmental Quality Board that is reasonably sufficient to maintain the duties necessary to implement this section.(2) Revenue from the fee collected in paragraph (1) shall be deposited into The Clean Water Fund. The money deposited into The Clean Water Fund shall be used by the department exclusively for the administration and enforcement of this section.(i) Regulations.--(1) The Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section.(2) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this section, the Environmental Quality Board shall promulgate temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The temporary regulations shall not be subject to:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 20260HB2246PN2937 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(3) The Environmental Quality Board's authority to adopt temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire two years after the effective date of this paragraph. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law before the expiration of the temporary regulations under paragraph (2).(j) Prohibition.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any existing department duty or requirement.(k) Appeals.--Any determination by the department under this section may be appealed in accordance with the act of July 13, 1988 (P.L.530, No.94), known as the Environmental Hearing Board Act.(l) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Covered data center." All or part of a facility that:(1) is composed of one or more businesses, owners or tenants;(2) is predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems;20260HB2246PN2937 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) may have uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, or both, cooling systems, towers and other temperature control infrastructure; and(4) has a proposed consumptive use of water exceeding 100,000 gallons per day over a period of 30 days.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2246PN2937 - 7 - 123456